Utah statutes.
78B-15-603.   Parties to proceeding.
The following individuals shall be joined as parties in a proceeding to
adjudicate parentage:
(1)  the mother of the child;
(2)  a man whose paternity of the child is to be adjudicated; and
(3)  the state pursuant to Section 78B-12-113.
